Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.020

Expenses of lieutenant governor acting as governor.

Whenever by reason of the absence from the state or the disability of the governor, the lieutenant governor is called upon temporarily to perform the duties of the office of governor, he or she shall be paid upon his or her personal voucher therefor the sum of ten dollars per day for expenses.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5006; 1965 c 8 s 43.03.020. Prior: 1919 c 118 s 1; RRS s 10979.]